Hawaii statutes.
§605-8 Practice in all courts; fees. [(a)]
The practitioners shall have the right to practice in all the courts of the
State, and to appear therein as attorneys in behalf of persons who may choose
to retain them, for the prosecution or defense of actions.

[(b)] Attorney's fees or commissions taxed or
allowed by the court shall be collected for the benefit of the attorney as
provided by section 507-81. [CC 1859, §1067; RL 1925, §2311; RL 1935, §3610; RL
1945, §9708; RL 1955, §217-8; HRS §605-8; am L 1972, c 184, §1(e); am L 2004, c
48, §3]

Cross References

Fees, see §§607-14 and 802-5.

Case Notes

Attorney general, etc., not to engage as private counsel in
divorce cases. 35 H. 849 (1941). See §580-44, persons affected with Hansen's
disease.

Court approval of substitution of attorney. 43 H. 51 (1958).

Law partner of attorney representing client not prevented
from being a witness; nor is attorney prevented from continuing in case. 51 H.
142, 454 P.2d 369 (1969).

Representation of conflicting interests. 59 H. 283, 582 P.2d
195 (1978).

Order granting disqualification of attorney is interlocutory
and not appealable without leave of court but writ of mandamus may be
available. 61 H. 552, 606 P.2d 1320 (1980).

Authority of attorney. Attorney for any party must show
attorney's authority, if demanded. 1 H. 118 (1854); 1 H. 205 (1856); 1 H. 366
(1856).

No implied authority from husband to wife to defend wife in
criminal suit brought at husband's instance and fee not recoverable from husband.
5 H. 23 (1883).

A legal right lost by negligence of attorney cannot be
restored by court. 9 H. 86 (1893).

Assistant public prosecutor; with consent private attorney
may assist prosecution. 19 H. 437 (1909); 20 H. 7 (1910); 20 H. 71 (1910).

Authority of insurance carrier to appeal from award against
insured. 32 H. 12 (1931).

Where litigant retains firm of attorneys each member of firm
becomes attorney for litigant and appearance of one member is appearance of the
firm. 22 H. 245 (1914).

Disbarment proceedings. Contempt of court. 2 H. 27 (1857).
Court can compel in disbarment proceedings return of fee or money wrongfully
taken. 5 H. 279 (1885). And may punish attorney for wrongful conduct in
obtaining fee. 15 H. 220 (1903). But for collecting excessive fee in good
faith, no wrongful conduct being shown. 15 H. 244 (1903). Attorney
disqualified by representing adverse interests. 30 H. 533 (1928). An account
stated between attorney and client may be void if fraud is practiced. 31 H. 517
(1930); 31 H. 599 (1930). Disbarment proceedings; attorney's conduct.
Attorney's duty not to misrepresent to court. 31 H. 929 (1931). Equity will
compel attorney to convey land purchased by attorney for another when attorney
has taken a deed in attorney's own name. 8 H. 57 (1890). Also when deed is
obtained from client through undue influence. 13 H. 402 (1901). As to when
statements of counsel are privileged. 23 H. 589, 591 (1917).

Fees. Attorney may recover reasonable fees for services
rendered; but court may relieve client from oppressive contract. 2 H. 677
(1863). Attorney's fees formerly not allowable in equity. 10 H. 462 (1896);
13 H. 237, 238 (1901); 13 H. 328 (1901). But see 17 H. 489 (1906); 33 H. 456
(1935); 33 H. 660 (1936) (injunction); 34 H. 288 (1937) (interpleader); 34 H.
854 (1939) (partition); 35 H. 595 (1940). Commissions not taxable in the
circuit court on amount of district court judgment. 14 H. 495 (1902). In
determining jurisdiction of district court statutory attorney's commissions not
included in ad damnum. 14 H. 290, 293 (1902); 15 H. 590 (1904). Guardian may
be allowed fee for services as attorney. 15 H. 394 (1904); 35 H. 262 (1939)
(guardian ad litem). On amounts of fees allowed in equity and probate proceedings.
13 H. 634 (1901); 14 H. 232, 244 (1902); 15 H. 394 (1904) and cases there
cited; 32 H. 943 (1934); 34 H. 263 (1937); 35 H. 473 (1940) (class
representation); 37 H. 447 (1947). In cases involving construction of will.
24 H. 573 (1918); 33 H. 666 (1936); 34 H. 376 (1937). Attorney's fees, when
allowed out of trust estate. 46 H. 475, 382 P.2d 920 (1963); 47 H. 216, 385
P.2d 828 (1963); 47 H. 629, 394 P.2d 432 (1964); 54 H. 299, 507 P.2d 724
(1973).

In cases involving surety on contractor's bond. 33 H. 607
(1935). Reasonable attorney's fee, determination. 44 H. 10, 352 P.2d 320
(1959).

Generally attorney's fees are not to be awarded as damages or
costs unless so provided by statute, stipulation, or agreement. 51 H. 462, 462
P.2d 905 (1969); 53 H. 69, 487 P.2d 769 (1971); 56 H. 111, 530 P.2d 7 (1974);
57 H. 599, 561 P.2d 1286 (1977); 58 H. 606, 575 P.2d 869 (1978).

Generally attorneys' fees not recoverable; but where
defendant's wrongful act places plaintiff in litigation with others or causes plaintiff
to incur expenses to protect plaintiff's interest, attorneys' fees
recoverable. 57 H. 102, 551 P.2d 171 (1976).

Attorney's fee was properly allowed within trial judge's
discretion although no evidence was considered. 60 H. 467, 591 P.2d 1060 (1979).

Liability for costs. Under rule of court attorney may be
made liable to clerk for court costs but not liable to parties. 11 H. 258
(1898); 12 H. 83 (1899); 22 H. 749 (1915). Attorney mulcted in costs for loose
pleadings. 6 H. 269 (1880). Court may require guardian to pay ward's wife
counsel fees for defense in proceedings for recovery of child. 9 H. 426
(1894). On revoking order of distribution, court cannot require attorney to
pay into court amount paid attorney as fee by client out of amount distributed
to such client. 15 H. 13 (1903). Court of law cannot require party to pay
opposing guardian ad litem fee. 15 H. 52 (1903). Attorney for unsuccessful
party in supreme court not personally liable to successful party for costs. 22
H. 749 (1915). Attorney's fees as costs. 35 H. 907 (1941). Ordinarily
counsel fees not taxable as costs. 42 H. 490 (1958); 44 H. 147, 355 P.2d 40
(1960); 44 H. 297, 353 P.2d 820 (1960); 44 H. 365, 355 P.2d 40 (1960); 46 H.
475, 382 P.2d 920 (1963). Order of substitution of attorneys should be
conditioned on reimbursement to original attorney of costs advanced by him and
on imposition of charging lien on any recovery to secure payment of his fees.
50 H. 413, 441 P.2d 638 (1968).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next